Utah statutes.
61-2g-402.   Principal place of business -- Display of documents -- Notify of changes -- Nonresidents.

(1)  A person licensed or certified under this chapter shall:

(a)  designate and maintain a principal place of business; and

(b)  conspicuously display the person's license or certification.

(2)  Upon a change of a person's principal business location or home address, a person licensed or certified under this chapter shall promptly send the division a signed statement notifying the division of the change within 10 business days of the change.

(3)  A nonresident licensee or certificate holder is not required to maintain a place of business in this state if the nonresident maintains an active place of business in the nonresident's state of domicile.

